Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB580.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 309.0836 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist
shall pay the board an initial fee for registration, and shall:
(a)[(1)] Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(b)[(2)] Have obtained a high school diploma or equivalent;
(c)[(3)] Have completed at least forty (40) classroom hours of board-approved
curriculum;
(d)[(4)] Have a peer support specialist supervisory agreement signed by the
applicant and the applicant's board-approved supervisor[Have passed a
written examination that has been approved by the board];
(e)[(5)] Have signed an agreement to abide by the standards of practice and code
of ethics approved by the board;
(f)[(6)] Attest to being in recovery for a minimum of twelve (12) consecutive
months immediately preceding the date of registration from a substance-
related disorder;
(g)[(7)] Have completed at least:
1.[(a)] Sixteen (16) hours of ethics training;
2.[(b)] Three (3) hours of domestic violence training;
3.[(c)] Two (2) hours of training in the transmission, control, treatment,
and prevention of the human immunodeficiency virus;
4.[(d)] Ten (10) hours of advocacy training;
5.[(e)] Ten (10) hours of training in mentoring and education; and
6.[(f)] Ten (10) hours of training in recovery support;
[(8) Have submitted two (2) letters of reference from certified alcohol and drug
counselors or licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselors;]
Page 1 of 3
HB058010.100 - 1518 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:54 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 580/GA
(h)[(9)] Live or work a majority of the time in Kentucky; and
(i)[(10)] Have complied with the requirements for the training program in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management in KRS 210.366 and any
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.
(2) (a) A temporary alcohol and drug peer support license shall only be valid for a
maximum period of nine (9) months from the date of issuance.
(b) Upon expiration of the nine (9) months, the individual shall seek
registration as an alcohol and drug peer support specialist or shall no
longer be permitted to provide reimbursable peer support services.
Section 2. KRS 222.233 is amended to read as follows:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
(1) (a) Until January 1, 2026, require that licensed alcohol and other drug treatment
entities and behavioral health service organizations only employ a temporary
alcohol and drug peer support specialist or alcohol and drug peer support
specialist who is registered under KRS Chapter 309 or a temporary alcohol
and drug peer support specialist or alcohol and drug peer support specialist
who meets the requirements of applicable administrative regulations in effect
on July 15, 2024, or any applicable administrative regulations promulgated
thereafter.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, require that licensed alcohol and other drug
treatment entities and behavioral health service organizations only employ a
temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist or alcohol and drug peer
support specialist who is registered under KRS Chapter 309;
(2) [Permit a registered temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist to provide
the same services and be reimbursed at the same rates as a registered alcohol and
drug peer support specialist;
Page 2 of 3
HB058010.100 - 1518 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:54 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 580/GA
(3) Remove any limits on the maximum number of hours of direct client care that may
be provided by a registered alcohol and drug peer support specialist;
(4) ]Require that a temporary certified alcohol and drug counselor under the clinical
supervision of a certified alcohol and drug counselor, a licensed alcohol and drug
counselor, or a licensed clinical alcohol or drug counselor be a reimbursable service
provider in alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral health service
organizations;
(3)[(5)] Permit a licensed alcohol and drug counselor to provide the same services and
be reimbursed at the same rates as a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor in
licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral health service
organizations;
(4)[(6)] Permit the qualifications for a case manager for an individual with mental or
substance use disorder to be a bachelor's degree or higher in any field of study and
set forth training and supervision requirements to substitute for required work
experience;
(5)[(7)] Require that a community support associate approved by the Department for
Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities to be a reimbursable
service provider in licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral
health service organizations;[ and]
(6)[(8)] Permit a registered peer support specialists to provide services to groups of
the same size as other licensed clinical professionals in a licensed alcohol and other
drug treatment entities and behavioral health service organizations; and
(7) Require a temporary peer support specialist to be limited to facilitating groups
with no more than eight (8) participants.
Page 3 of 3
HB058010.100 - 1518 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:54 PM GA